New Jersey, session 222, S2890.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    An insurer providing stop loss or excess risk insurance shall provide to the plan sponsor not less than 90 days written notice of cancellation or nonrenewal of the policy in a form to be determined by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to stop loss or excess risk insurance policies issued or renewed in this State on or after the 90th day next following enactment.